 506  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 that states were democratizing the political process. S­ o-​­called freewill ministers insisted that everyone, regardless of their wealth or circumstances, could choose to be saved by embracing Jesus’s promise of salvation just as more men who owned no property were allowed to choose their elected officials. Evangelicals assumed that the American republic had a G ­ od-​­mandated mission to provide a shining example of representative government, much as Puritan New England had once stood as an example of an ideal Christian community. The concept of America having a special ­God-​­given mission to create an ideal society (often called “manifest destiny”) still carried strong spiritual overtones. The sense of America being on a ­God-​­directed mission also contained an element of perfectionism: people could become more and more perfect through a commitment to reforming themselves and society. Throughout the first half of the nineteenth century, reformers fanned out across the United States, and the combination of widespread religious energy and intense social activism brought major advances in human rights. It also at times triggered cynicism and disillusionment.

A
More Democratic Religion  The energies of the rational Enlightenment and the spiritual Great Awakening flowed from the colonial period into the nineteenth century. In different ways, these two powerful modes of thought, one scientific and rational and the other religious and optimistic, eroded the old Calvinist view that people were innately sinful and that God had chosen only a select few for heavenly salvation (a doctrine referred to as “predestination”). During the nineteenth century, many Christians embraced a more democratic religious outlook. Just as Enlightenment rationalism stressed humanity’s natural goodness and encouraged a belief in progress through democratic reforms and individual improvement, Protestant churches stressed that all people were capable of perfection through the guiding light of Christ and their own activism.

 rational religion Enlightenment ideas, including the religious concept of Deism, inspired prominent leaders such as Thomas Jefferson and Benjamin Franklin. Deists believed in a rational ­God—​­creator of the rational ­universe—​­and that all people were created as equals. They prized science and reason over traditional religion and blind faith. Interest in Deism increased after the American Revolution. Through the use of reason and scientific research, Deists believed, people might grasp the natural laws governing the universe. Deists rejected the belief that every ­statement in the Bible was literally true and questioned the divinity of Jesus. They also defended free speech and opposed religious coercion.

A
More Democratic Religion 507 

 unitarianism and universalism The same ideals of Enlightenment rationalism that excited Deists soon began to make deep inroads into American Protestantism. The old churches in and around Boston proved especially vulnerable to the appeal of ­anti-​­Puritan religious liberalism. By the end of the eighteenth century, w ­ ell-​­educated New Englanders, most of them Congregationalists, were embracing Unitarianism, a “liberal” faith that emphasized the oneness (“unity”) and compassion of a loving God, the natural goodness of humankind, the superiority of calm reason over emotional forms of worship, the rejection of the Calvinist belief in predestination, and a general rather than literal reading of the Bible. Unitarians abandoned the concept of the Trinity (God the Father, the Son, and the Holy Ghost) that had long been central to the Christian faith. Unitarians believed that God and Jesus are separate; Jesus was a saintly man (but not divine) who set a shining example of a good life. People are not inherently sinful, Unitarians stressed. By following the teachings of Jesus and trusting the guidance of their own consciences, all people are eligible for the gift of salvation from a God who is not angry and unforgiving but blessed with boundless love. Boston became the center of the organized Unitarian movement, which ­initially emerged within Congregational churches. During the early nineteenth century, “liberal” churches adopted the name Unitarian. Many of its early supporters were among the ­best-​­educated and wealthiest New Englanders. A parallel ­anti-​­Calvinist religious movement, Universalism, attracted a ­different—​­and much l­arger—​­social group: the working poor. In 1779, John Murray, a British clergyman, founded the first Universalist church, in Gloucester, Massachusetts. Like the Unitarians, Universalists proclaimed the dignity and worth of all people. They stressed that people must liberate themselves from the rule of priests and ministers and use their own capacity to reason to explore the mysteries of existence. To Universalists and Unitarians, hell did not exist. Salvation was “universal,” available to everyone through the sacrifice of Jesus. In essence, Universalists thought God was too good and caring to damn people to hell, while Unitarians thought themselves too good to be damned. (The two denominations would combine in 1961, becoming the Unitarian Universalist faith.) the second great awakening

 The rise of Universalism and Unitarianism did not mean that traditional religious beliefs were waning. In fact, evangelism was widespread. During the first Great Awakening in the early 1700s, traveling revivalists had promoted a more intense and personal relationship with God. In addition, Anglicanism suffered from being aligned

 508  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 with the Church of England; it lost its status as the official religion in most states after the American Revolution. To help erase their ­pro-​­British image, Virginia Anglicans renamed themselves Episcopalians. But even the new name did not prevent the Episcopal Church from losing its leadership position in the South. Newer denominations, especially ­Baptists and Methodists, 20 percent of whom were African American, emerged and attracted masses of excited followers. These Christian sects were organized in accord with ­ more-​ d ­ emocratic principles; they allowed John Wesley Wesley’s gravestone individual congregations to exercise reads, “Lord let me not live to be useless.” more power on their own than did the Anglican Church. In 1784, Methodists met in Baltimore and announced that they were abandoning Episcopalianism and forming a distinct new denomination committed to the aggressive conversion of all people: men, women, Indians, and African Americans. The r­eform-​­minded Methodists, inspired by their founder, the English Anglican priest John Wesley, abandoned the gloomy predestination of Calvinism in favor of a life of “cheerful activism.” Around 1800, the United States experienced a huge wave of religious revivals called the Second Great Awakening. Without religion, revivalists warned, the American republic would give way to “unbridled appetites and lust.” While all denominations grew as a result of the Second Great Awakening, the evangelical s­ ects—​­Baptists, Methodists, and ­Presbyterians—​­experienced explosive popularity. In 1780, the nation had only 50 Methodist churches; by 1860, there were 20,000, far more than any other denomination. The percentage of Americans who joined Protestant churches increased sixfold between 1800 and 1860. The Second Great Awakening involved two different centers of activity. One developed among the elite New England colleges that were founded as religious centers of learning, then spread across western New York into Pennsylvania and Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois. The other center emerged in the b ­ ackwoods of Tennessee and Kentucky and spread in every direction across rural America. Both the urban and rural phases of Protestant revival-

A
More Democratic Religion 509 

 ism shared a simple message: salvation is available not just to a select few, as the Calvinist Puritans had claimed, but to anyone who repents and embraces Christ.

 frontier revivals

 In its frontier phase, the Second Great Awakening, like the first, generated tremendous excitement and emotional excesses. It gave birth to two religious p ­ henomena—​­the traveling backwoods evangelist and the frontier camp ­meeting—​­that helped keep the fires of revivalism and spiritual intensity burning. People in the early nineteenth century found the supernatural inside as well as outside of churches; they readily believed in magic, dreams, visions, miraculous healing, and speaking in tongues (a spontaneous babbling precipitated by the workings of the Holy Spirit). Evangelists and “exhorters” (spiritual speakers who were not formal ministers) with colorful nicknames such as Jumpin’ Jesus or Crazy Dow or Mad Isaac found ready audiences among lonely frontier folk hungry for spiritual intensity and a sense of community. Mass revivals were ­family-​­oriented, ­community-​­building events; they bridged social, economic, political, and even racial divisions. Women, especially, flocked to the rural revivals and served as the backbone of religious life on the frontier. At the end of the eighteenth century, ministers visiting the western territories reported that there were few frontier churches and few people attending them. To remedy the situation, traveling evangelists emerged. The first large camp meeting occurred in August 1801 on a Kentucky hillside called Cane Ridge, east of Lexington. A Presbyterian minister named James McGready invited Protestants in the region to attend, and as many as 20,000 frontier folk came from miles around, camping in tents for nine days. White and black ministers, mostly Baptists and Methodists, preached day and night, often chanting their sermons in ways that prompted listeners to cry: “Amen!” “Hallelujah!” “Lord, have mercy!” The frontier revivals generated intense emotions as people experienced ­on-​­the-​­spot conversions. One participant at Cane Ridge observed that “some of the people were singing, others praying, some crying for mercy.” As news of the Cane Ridge gathering spread, Protestant evangelists, especially Methodists, organized similar revivals in other states. One participant reported that the revivals created “such a gust of the power of God” that it seemed “the very gates of hell would give way.” Not all were swept up in the religious emotionalism. Frances Trollope, a distinguished English writer who toured the United States in 1827, attended a frontier revival and thought the participants behaved like raving lunatics. She

 510  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 Religious revivalism Frontier revivals and prayer meetings ignited religious fervor within both ministers and participants. In this 1830s camp meeting, the women are so intensely moved by the sermon that they shed their bonnets and fell to their knees.

 fled the roiling scene in panic. Similarly, a Catholic priest in Kentucky scoffed at the absurd “mob fanaticism” of the camp meetings. The revivals, however, were quite popular with many Americans. “Hell is trembling, and Satan’s kingdom falling,” reported a South Carolinian in 1802. “The sacred flame” of religious revival is “extending far and wide.” In 1776, about one in six Americans belonged to a church; by 1850, it was one in three. When asked to reflect on the social changes that had occurred during his life, William Grayson, a South Carolina planter, commented that “religion had revived. The churches were filled.”

 denominational growth

 Among the established denominations, Presbyterianism was entrenched among those with S­ cots-​­Irish backgrounds, from Pennsylvania to Georgia. Presbyterians gained further from the Plan of Union with the Congregationalists. Since the Presbyterians and the Congregationalists agreed on theology, they were able to form unified congregations and “call” (recruit) a minister from either denomination. The result through much of the Old Northwest (Ohio, Michigan, Indiana, and Illinois)

A
More Democratic Religion 511 

 was that New Englanders became Presbyterians by way of the “Presbygational” churches. The frontier revivals were dominated by Baptist and Methodist factions. There were Primitive Baptists, Hardshell Baptists, Freewill Baptists and Methodists, Particular Baptists, and many others. The Baptist theology was grounded in biblical f­undamentalism—​­a certainty that every word and story in the Bible are divinely inspired and literally true. Unlike the earlier Puritans, however, the Baptists believed that everyone could gain salvation by choosing (via “free will”) to receive God’s grace and by being baptized as adults. The Baptists also stressed the social equality of all before God, regardless of wealth, status, or education. The Methodists, who shared with Baptists the belief in free will, developed the most effective evangelical method: the “circuit rider,” a traveling evangelist (“itinerant”) on horseback who sought converts in remote frontier settlements. The itinerant system began with Francis Asbury, a tireless B ­ ritish-​­born revivalist who traveled across fifteen states and preached thousands of sermons. After Asbury, Peter Cartwright emerged as the most successful circuit rider. Cartwright grew up in one of the most violent and lawless regions of frontier Kentucky. His brother was hanged as a murderer, and his sister was said to be a prostitute. Cartwright himself had been a hellion until, at age fifteen, he decided to attend a frontier revival meeting: In the midst of a solemn struggle of soul, an impression was made in my mind, as though a voice said to me, “Thy sins are all forgiven thee.” Divine light flashed all around me, unspeakable joy sprung up in my soul. I rose to my feet, opened my eyes, and it really seemed as if I was in heaven. . . . ​My mother raised the shout, my Christian friends crowded around me and joined me in praising God; and though I have been since then, in many instances, unfaithful, yet I have never for one moment, doubted that the Lord did, then and there, forgive my sins and give me religion. The following year, Cartwright became a religious exhorter, preaching the faith even though he was not yet an ordained minister. At age eighteen, Cartwright began roaming across Kentucky, Tennessee, Ohio, and Indiana as a Methodist circuit rider. For more than twenty years, he preached a sermon a day, three hours at a time. Crowds flocked to hear his simple message: salvation is free for all to embrace. At one revival in Illinois, Cartwright, who was running for Congress as an ­anti-​­slavery Jacksonian Democrat, asked those who thought they were going

 512  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 Black Methodists Holding a Prayer Meeting (1811) This caricature of an African American Methodist meeting in Philadelphia shows a preacher in the church doorway, while his congregation engages in exuberant prayer.

 to heaven to stand. He then asked those who did not desire to go to hell to do the same. The only person in the crowd who did not stand for either choice was a tall, t­ hirty-​­seven-​­year-​­old Whig attorney named Abraham ­Lincoln—​ ­Cartwright’s opponent in the election. “May I inquire of you, Mr. Lincoln,” asked Cartwright, “where are you going?” Lincoln replied that he was “going to Congress.” Soon thereafter, he defeated Cartwright.

 revivalism and african americans

 The revivals broke down conventional social barriers. Free African Americans were especially attracted to the emotional energies of the Methodist and Baptist churches, in part because many white circuit riders were opposed to slavery. African American Richard Allen, a freed slave in Philadelphia, said in 1787 that “there was no religious sect or denomination that would suit the capacity of the colored people as well as the Methodist.” He decided that the “plain and simple gospel suits best for any people; for the unlearned can understand [it].” Even more important, the Methodists actively recruited blacks. They were “the first people,” Allen noted, “that brought glad tidings to the colored people.” In 1816, Allen helped found the African Methodist Episcopal (AME) Church, the first black denomination in America.

A
More Democratic Religion 513 

 camp meetings and women The energies of the Great Revival, as the Second Great Awakening was called, spread through the western states and into m ­ ore-​­settled regions back East. The fastest growth was along the frontier, where camp meetings were an expression of the frontier’s democratic spirit. Revivals were typically held in late summer or fall, when farmwork eased. Baptist, Methodist, and Presbyterian ministers often worked as a team, and crowds would frequently number in the thousands. Mass excitement swept up even the most skeptical onlookers, and infusions of the spirit sparked strange behavior. Some went into trances; others contracted the “jerks,” babbled in unknown tongues, or got down on all fours and barked like dogs to “tree the devil.” The camp meetings also offered a social outlet to isolated rural folk, especially women, for whom the gatherings provided a welcome alternative to the rigors and loneliness of farm life. Evangelical ministers repeatedly applauded the spiritual energies of women and affirmed their right to give public witness to their faith and to play a leading role in efforts at social reform. At a time when women were banned from preaching, Jarena Lee, a free black who lived in the Philadelphia area, was the first African American woman to become a minister in the African Methodist Episcopal Church (AME). As she wrote, “If the man may preach, because the Saviour died for him, why not the woman? Seeing [as] he died for her also.” Lee became a tireless revivalist during the 1830s; according to her own records, she “traveled 2,325 miles and preached 178 sermons.” The organizational needs of large revivals offered ample opportunities for women. Phoebe Worrall Palmer, for example, hosted prayer meetings in her New York City home and eventually traveled across the country as a ­camp-​ ­meeting exhorter, assuring listeners that they could gain a life without sin. Women like Palmer found public roles within evangelical denominations because of their emphasis on individual religious experiences rather than conventional, ­male-​­dominated church structures. Palmer claimed a woman’s right to preach by citing the biblical emphasis on obeying God rather than man. “It is always right to obey the Holy Spirit’s command,” she stressed, “and if that is laid upon a woman to preach the Gospel, then it is right for her to do so; it is a duty she cannot neglect without falling into condemnation.” Such opportunities reinforced women’s ­self-​­confidence, and their religious enthusiasm often inspired them to pursue social reforms for women, including greater educational opportunities and the right to vote. religion and reform

 Regions roiled by revival fever were compared to forests devastated by fire. Western New York, in fact, experienced

 514  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 such fiery levels of evangelical activity that it was labeled the ­burned-​­over district. One reason the area was such a hotbed of evangelical activity was the Erie Canal, which opened in 1825. Both the construction of and traffic on the canal turned many towns into rollicking scenes of lawlessness: gambling, prostitution, public drunkenness, and crime. Such widespread sinfulness made the region ripe for revivalism.

 charles g. finney

 The most successful evangelist in the b ­ urned-​ ­ ver district was a former attorney turned Presbyterian minister named Charles o Grandison Finney. In the winter of 1830–1831, he theatrically preached with “a clear, shrill voice,” pouring “out fire” for six months in Rochester, then in a canal boomtown in upstate New York. In the process, he generated some 100,000 conversions, became the most celebrated minister in the country, and perfected religious revivals as ­well-​­organized and orchestrated spectacles. While rural ­camp-​­meeting revivals attracted farm families and other ­working-​­class groups, Finney’s audiences in the Northeast attracted ­more-​ ­prosperous seekers. “The Lord,” Finney declared, “was aiming at the conversion of the highest classes of society.” In 1836, he built a huge church in New York City to accommodate his rapidly growing congregation. Finney focused on the question that had preoccupied Protestantism for centuries: what role can the individual play in earning salvation? Finney and other freewill evangelists wanted to democratize the opportunity for salvation by insisting that everyone, rich or poor, black or white, could choose to be “saved” simply by embracing the promise of Jesus and rejecting the lure of sinfulness. Finney’s democratic gospel combined embracing faith and doing good works. For him, revivalism led first to personal reform and then to the improvement of society. By embracing Christ, a convert could thereafter be free of sin, but Christians also had an obligation to improve society by perfecting themselves. The evangelical revivals provided much of the energy behind the sweeping reform impulse that characterized the age of Jacksonian democracy. Catharine Beecher, a leading advocate for evangelical religion and social reform, stressed that the success of American democracy “depends upon the intellectual and moral character of the mass of people. If they are intelligent and virtuous, democracy is a blessing; but if they are ignorant and wicked, it is only a curse.”

The Mormons
 The spiritual stirrings of the Second Great Awakening also spawned new religious groups. The b ­ urned-​­over district in New York gave rise to several religious movements, the most important of which was Mormonism. Its founder,

A
More Democratic Religion 515 

 Joseph Smith Jr., was the child of intensely religious Vermont farm folk who settled in the village of Palmyra, in western New York, amid the hyperemotional revivalism of the Second Great Awakening. In 1823, the e­ ighteen-​­year-​­old Smith reported that an angel named Moroni appeared by his bedside and announced that God needed Smith’s help. Moroni had led him to a hillside near his father’s farm, where he had unearthed a box containing golden plates on which was etched, in an ancient language, a lost “gospel” explaining the history of ancient America. It described a group of Israelites (“Nephites”) who crossed the Atlantic on barges and settled America 2,100 years before Columbus. Smith set about laboriously translating the “reformed Egyptian” inscriptions on the plates. Much of the language he transcribed was in fact drawn from the Bible. But that mattered not to his earnest followers. In 1830, Smith convinced a friend to mortgage his farm to pay for the publication of the first 5,000 copies of the 500-page text he called The Book of Mormon: An Account Written by the Hand of Mormon upon Plates Taken from the Plates of Nephi. Young Smith began gathering thousands of converts (“saints”). Eventually, convinced that his authority came directly from God, he formed what he called the Church of Jesus Christ of ­Latter-​­day Saints, more popularly known as the Mormons. Smith maintained that God, angels, and people were all members of the same ­flesh-​­and-​­blood species. In his s­ elf-​­appointed role as the Mormon Prophet, Smith criticized the sins of the rich, preached universal salvation, denied that there was a hell, urged his followers to practice a strict code of personal morality by avoiding liquor, tobacco, and caffeine, and asserted that the Second Coming of Christ was looming. He promised followers “a nation, a new Israel, a people bound as much by heritage and identity as by belief.” Within a few years, Smith had gathered thousands of converts, most of them poor New England farmers who had migrated to western New York.

 years of persecution

 From the outset, the Mormon “saints” upset both their “gentile” neighbors and the civil authorities. Mormons stood out with their secret rituals, their refusal to abide by local laws and conventions, and their clannishness. Smith denied the legitimacy of civil governments and the U.S. Constitution. As a result, no community wanted to host him and his “peculiar people,” a term taken from the New Testament. In their search for a refuge from persecution and for the “promised land,” the ­ever-​­growing contingent of Mormons moved from western New York to Ohio, then to Missouri, where the governor called for them to be “exterminated or driven from the state.” Forced out, Smith and the Mormons moved in 1839 to the ­half-​­built town of Commerce, Illinois, on the Mississippi River.

 516  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 They renamed the town Nauvoo (a crude translation of a Hebrew word meaning “beautiful land”). Within five years, Nauvoo had become the second largest city in the state, and Joseph Smith, “the Prophet,” became Nauvoo’s religious dictator. He owned the hotel and general store, published the newspaper, served as mayor, chief justice, and commander of the city’s 2,000-strong army, and was the trustee of the Church. Smith’s lust for power and for women grew as well. He began excommunicating dissidents, and in 1844 he announced his intention to become president of the United States. Smith’s remarkable sexual energy led him to practice “plural marriage” (polygamy); he accumulated more than two dozen wives, many of them already married to other men, and he encouraged other Mormon leaders to do the same. In 1844, a crisis arose when Mormon dissenters, including Smith’s first wife, Emma, denounced his polygamy. The result was not only a split in the church but also an attack on Nauvoo by ­non-​­Mormons. When Smith ordered Mormons to destroy an opposition newspaper, he and his brother Hyrum were arrested and charged with treason. On June 27, 1844, a mob stormed the jail and killed the Smith brothers. The New York Herald predicted that his death would kill Mormonism.

 brigham young

 Brigham Young Young headed the Mormons from 1847 to 1877.

In Brigham
 Young, however, the Mormons found a new and, in many ways, better leader. Elected in 1844 to succeed Smith, Young would not only preserve the Mormon Church but create a new theocratic empire. ­Strong-​­minded, intelligent, authoritarian, and charismatic, Young was an early convert to Mormonism. Smith, he remembered, “took heaven . . . ​ and brought it down to earth.” Because Nauvoo continued to arouse the suspicions of ­non-​­Mormons, Young began to look for another home for his flock. Their new destination turned out to be 1,300 miles away, near the Great Salt Lake in Utah, a vast, sparsely populated area that was part of Mexico. The first to arrive at the Great Salt Lake in July 1847 found “a broad and barren

A
More Democratic Religion 517 

 plain hemmed in by the mountains . . . ​the paradise of the lizard, the cricket and the rattlesnake.” But Young declared that “this is the place” to settle. By the end of 1848, the Mormons had developed an efficient irrigation system for their farms, and over the next decade they brought about a spectacular greening of the desert. At first they organized their own state, named Deseret (meaning “Land of the Honeybee”), and elected Young governor. But their independence was ­short-​­lived. In 1848, Mexico signed the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, transferring to the United States what is now California, Nevada, Utah, Texas, and parts of Arizona, New Mexico, Colorado, and Wyoming. Two years later, Congress incorporated the Utah Territory into the United States. Nevertheless, when Young was named the territorial governor, the new arrangement gave the Mormons virtual independence. MORMON TREK, 1830–1851

CANADA OREGON

 M i s sissip

 TS

.


Kirtland
1831–1837


 r ve Ri

 KY

 NC

 LA

PA A

 MS

 AL

 SC

 GA

 LA

 MEXICO

 FL





 MD

 VA

C


O hio


P


 AR

 OH

 pi

Y


 TEXAS

 Mormon settlements The Mormon Trail, 1830–1851 Proposed state of Deseret

 PA

 TN

R iv


T


R


 er

N


 oR

 MI

 IL

 MO

U


MEXICO TERRITORY

Independence
1831–1839


O


San Bernardino
Color a d
 NEW

C


 r

S.
 MT

Salt Lake City
 ive

Palmyra


M


 er

 UTAH

 TERRITORY

NY WI

 Winter quarters 1846–1847 IA Nauvoo IN r Pl a tt e Rive 1839–1845

Great Salt Lake


 CALIFORNIA

MINNESOTA TERRITORY

 AN

Riv


A N
D I
I N


 ri

 HI

M i s s ou


KY ROC

 TERRITORY

300 Miles


150 300 Kilometers


 ■ Where were Mormon settlements established between 1830 and 1851? WWN64 ■ Why did Joseph Smith initially lead his congregation west? Figure M12_1 ■ proof Why was the Utah Territory an ideal place for the Mormons to settle, at least First 29p6 initially? x 23p0

 NJ

 518  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 For more than twenty years, Young ruled with an iron hand, allowing no dissent and defying federal authority. Not until 1896, after the Mormons disavowed the practice of polygamy, was Utah admitted as a state. Out of its eerily secret beginnings and early struggles, Mormonism today is the fourth largest religious denomination in the world.

Romanticism in America
 The revival of religious life during the early 1800s was one of many efforts throughout the United States and Europe to unleash the stirrings of the spirit. Another great cultural shift was the Romantic movement in thought, literature, and the arts. The movement began in Europe, as young people rebelled against the w ­ ell-​ ­ordered rational world promoted by the Enlightenment. Were there not, after all, more things in the world than reason, science, and logic could explain: spontaneous moods, impressions, and feelings; mysterious, unknown, and h ­ alf-​­seen things? In areas in which science could neither prove nor disprove concepts, the Romantics believed that people were justified in having faith. They preferred the stirrings of the heart over the calculations of the head, nonconformity over traditional behavior, and the mystical over the rational. Americans embraced the Romantics’ emphasis on individualism and the virtues of common people.

 transcendentalism

 The most intense American advocates of Romantic ideals were the transcendentalists of New England, the first group of rebellious intellectuals committed to reshaping the nation’s cultural life. The word transcendentalism came from an emphasis on thoughts and behaviors that transcend (or rise above) the limits of reason and logic. To transcendentalists, the inner life of the spirit took priority over science. Transcendentalism, said one of its champions, meant an interest in areas “a little beyond” the scope of reason. Transcendentalism at times seemed irrational, rejecting both religious orthodoxy and the “­ corpse-​­ cold” rationalism of Unitarianism. Transcendentalists believed that reality was not simply what you can touch and see; it included the innate promptings of the mind and the spiritual world. Above all, they believed in “­self-​­reliance” and embraced a pure form of personal spirituality (“intuitions of the soul”) uncorrupted by theological dogma. The miracles described in the Bible were much less important to transcendentalists than the evidence of an individual’s own intuitive spirituality. Transcendentalists wanted individuals to look within themselves for spiritual insights. Ralph Waldo Emerson, the movement’s leader, stressed that

Romanticism in America  519


 its aim was to “purify one’s own soul and live with full integrity, becoming a model, rather than a nagging goad, to others.” Transcendentalists also wanted to nurture a romantic spirituality in harmony with nature. Natural beauty, they believed, had the transcendent power to startle people into ­self-​­awareness. As Henry David Thoreau described his own n ­ ature-​­inspired spirituality, “I believe in the forest, and in the meadow, and in the night in which the corn grows.” All people, transcendentalists believed, had the capacity for s­ elf-​­realization, enabling them to tap the divine “spark” present in all of God’s creations. In short, transcendentalists wanted everyone to summon the courage to think their own thoughts and develop their own beliefs. S­ elf-​­discovery was the essential step in fulfilling potential. By the 1830s, New England transcendentalism had become the most influential force in American culture.

 ralph waldo emerson

 More than anyone else, Ralph Waldo Emerson embodied the transcendentalist gospel, which rejected conventional religion in favor of individual spiritual growth and “­self-​­culture.” To Emerson, s­ elf-​­knowledge opened the doors to ­self-​­improvement and ­self-​­realization.

 The Indian’s Vespers (1847) Asher B. Durand’s painting of a Native American saluting the sun captures the Romantic ideals of personal spirituality and the uncorrupted natural world that swept America during the early nineteenth century.

 520  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 Emerson became the most popular speaker in the United States during the 1840s. “We have listened too long to the courtly muses of Europe,” he said. “We will walk on our own feet; we will work with our own hands; we will speak with our own minds.” He exhorted the young American republic to shed its cultural inferiority complex and create its own distinctive literature, art, and thought. The son of a Unitarian preacher, Emerson graduated from Harvard College in 1821 and became a Unitarian parson in 1829, but three years later he turned away from all organized religions because they stifled free thinking. He sought instead to cultivate a Ralph Waldo Emerson Emerson, a poet personal spirituality in communion and philosopher, is most remembered with nature. for leading the transcendentalist After traveling in Europe, where he movement. met England’s greatest Romantic writers, Emerson settled in Concord, Massachusetts, to take up the life of an essayist, poet, and lecturer (“preacher to the world”). He found God in nature and came to believe not in damnation but in human perfectibility. Impossibly optimistic, Emerson celebrated the virtues of ­self-​­reliance and the individual’s unlimited potential. In 1836, Emerson published the pathbreaking book Nature, which helped launch the transcendental movement. In it, he stressed that sensitive people could “transcend” the material world and discover the “spirit” animating the universe. Individuals, in other words, could exercise godlike powers. The spirit of s­ elf-​­reliant individualism in Emerson’s lectures and writings provided the energetic core of the transcendentalist outlook. “The American Scholar,” a speech he delivered at Harvard in 1837, urged young Americans to put aside their reverence for European culture and explore the beauties and freedoms of their own world. Emerson’s essay “­Self-​­Reliance” (1841) expresses the distinctive transcendentalist outlook: Whoso would be a man, must be a nonconformist. . . . ​Nothing is at last sacred but the integrity of your own mind. . . . ​It is easy in the world to

Romanticism in America  521


 live after the world’s opinion; it is easy in solitude to live after our own; but the great man is he who in the midst of a crowd keeps with perfect sweetness the independence of solitude. . . . ​A foolish consistency is the hobgoblin of little minds, adored by little statesmen and philosophers and divines. . . . ​Speak what you think now in hard words and tomorrow speak what tomorrow thinks in hard words again, though it contradict everything you said today. . . . ​To be great is to be misunderstood. Emerson’s belief that every man and woman possessed godlike virtues inspired generations. He championed a ­self-​­reliant individualism that reinforced the democratic energies inspiring Jacksonian America.

 the transcendental club

 In 1836, an informal discussion group that came to be called the Transcendental Club began to meet in Boston and nearby Concord to discuss philosophy, literature, and religion. The transcendentalists teasingly called themselves the “club of the ­like-​­minded,” quipped James Freeman Clarke, a Boston preacher and abolitionist, “because no two of us thought alike,” except perhaps in their shared rejection of traditional forms of authority. The diverse club included cultural rebels and social critics, all of whom displayed extravagant idealism and moral urgency in striving for uniqueness and originality. They were liberal clergymen, utopian reformers, militant abolitionists, innovative writers, and brilliant women such as Elizabeth Peabody, her sister Sophia (who married writer Nathaniel Hawthorne), and Margaret Fuller, the author of Woman in the Nineteenth Century (1845). Fluent in six languages, the dynamic Fuller was one of America’s first feminists, a brilliant conversationalist who organized a transcendentalist discussion group that met in Elizabeth Peabody’s Boston bookstore. Their “Conversations” were designed to embolden the city’s brightest women to think and act for themselves. Fuller helped launch and edit the Dial (1840–1844), a transcendentalist magazine that introduced American readers to European Romanticism.

 henry david thoreau

 Emerson’s young friend and neighbor, Henry David Thoreau, practiced the thoughtful s­elf-​­reliance and pursuit of perfection that Emerson preached. “I like people who can do things,” Emerson said, and Thoreau, fourteen years his junior, could do many things: carpentry, masonry, painting, surveying, sailing, gardening. Thoreau displayed a powerful sense of uncompromising integrity and prickly individuality. “If a man does not keep pace with his companions,” he wrote, “perhaps it is because he hears a different drummer.”

 522  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 Thoreau described himself as “a mystic, a transcendentalist, and a natural philosopher” who questioned tradition and challenged authority. Emerson said his younger friend was “stubborn and implacable; always manly and wise, but rarely sweet.” A neighbor was more blunt. “I love Henry,” said Elizabeth Hoar, “but I do not like him.” Born in Concord in 1817, Thoreau attended Harvard, where he exhausted the library’s resources. After a brief stint as a teacher, he worked with his father, a pencil maker. Like Emerson, however, Thoreau viewed “the indescribable innocence” of nature as a living bible; the earth to him was a form of poetry, full of hidden meanings Henry David Thoreau Thoreau was and l­ife-​­giving energies. Walks in the a social rebel, environmentalist, and woods inspired him more than attendlifelong abolitionist. ing church. Christianity, he believed, was a dying institution. His priorities were inward. He once described himself as a “Realometer,” working his feet “downward through the mud and slush of opinion, and prejudice and tradition, and delusion, and appearances . . . ​to a hard bottom.” Thoreau showed little interest in friends or marriage and no interest in wealth, which he believed corrupted the pursuit of happiness by making p ­ eople slaves to materialism. “The mass of men,” he wrote, “lead lives of quiet desperation” because they were preoccupied with making money. Thoreau yearned to experience the “extremities” of life and not be bound by stuffy tradition, unjust laws, “good behavior,” or the opinions of his elders. He committed himself to leading what Emerson called a simple life centered on “plain living and high thinking.” He loved to be alone, free to think for himself. Thoreau rented a room at the Emersons’ home, where he tended the family garden, worked as a handyman, and took long walks with his host. “I delight much in my young friend,” Emerson wrote, “who seems to have as free and erect a mind as any I have ever met.” In 1844, when Emerson bought fourteen acres along Walden Pond, Thoreau decided to embark upon an unusual experiment in ­self-​­reliance. On July 4, 1845, at age ­twenty-​­seven, Thoreau took to the woods to live in a tiny, ­one-​­room cabin he had built for t­ wenty-​­eight dollars at Walden Pond,

Romanticism in America  523


 just over a mile outside of Concord. His goal was to demonstrate that nature was sufficient for his needs. “I went to the woods because I wished to live deliberately,” he wrote in Walden, or Life in the Woods (1854), “ . . . ​and not, when I came to die, discover that I had not lived.” During Thoreau’s two years at Walden Pond, the United States declared war against Mexico, largely to acquire Texas, then part of Mexico. He felt it was an unjust war pushed by southern cotton planters eager to add more slave territory. His disgust for the war led him to refuse to pay taxes, for which he was put in jail (for only one night; an aunt paid the tax). This incident inspired Thoreau to write his ­now-​­classic essay, “Civil Disobedience” (1849), which would influence Martin Luther King Jr. in shaping the civil rights movement a hundred years later. “If the law is of such a nature that it requires you to be an agent of injustice to another,” Thoreau wrote, “then, I say, break the law.” Until his death in 1862, Thoreau attacked slavery and applauded those who worked to undermine it. The continuing influence of Thoreau’s creed of taking individual action against injustice shows the impact that a thoughtful person can have on the world.

 an american literature

 Thoreau and Emerson portrayed the transcendentalist movement as an expression of moral idealism; critics dismissed it as outrageous ­self-​­centeredness. Although the transcendentalists attracted only a small following in their own time, they inspired a generation of writers that produced the first great age of American literature. The half decade of 1850 to 1855 witnessed an outpouring of extraordinary writing in the United States, a nation that had long suffered an inferiority complex about the quality of its arts. Those five years saw the writing of Representative Men by Emerson; Walden, or Life in the Woods by Thoreau; The Scarlet Letter and The House of the Seven Gables by Nathaniel Hawthorne; ­Moby-​­Dick by Herman Melville; Leaves of Grass by Walt Whitman; and hundreds of unpublished poems by Emily Dickinson.

Literary Giants
 national hawthorne

 Nathaniel Hawthorne, the supreme writer of the New England group, never shared the sunny optimism of his neighbors or their perfectionist belief in reform. A native and longtime inhabitant of Salem, Massachusetts, he was haunted by the knowledge of evil bequeathed to him by his Puritan forebears, one of whom (John Hathorne) had been a judge at the Salem witchcraft trials. After college, Nathaniel Hawthorne worked in obscurity in Salem, gradually selling a few stories, and finally earning a degree of fame with ­Twice-​­Told Tales (1837). In these stories, as in most of his later

 524  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 work, his central themes e­ xamined sin and its consequences: pride and selfishness, secret guilt, and the impossibility of rooting sin out of the human soul.

 emily dickinson

 Emily Dickinson, the most strikingly original of the New England poets, never married. In fact, as she wrote, she enjoyed the habit of “shunning Men and Women.” From her birth in 1830 to her death in 1886, she lived with her parents and sister in Amherst, Massachusetts. There, in a spartan corner bedroom on the second floor of the family house, the slim, r­ed-​­haired poet found s­elf-​ ­expression in poetry, ever grateful that “one is one’s self & not somebody else.” Emily Dickinson Dickinson offered the Dickinson lived what her niece world of New England literature a fresh called a life of “exquisite s­elf-​containfemale voice. ment.” She often refused to meet visitors or even leave her room. Fired by “the light of insight and the fire of emotion,” she wrote verse remarkable for its simplicity and brevity. Only a handful of her almost 1,800 poems were published before her death. As she famously wrote, “Success is counted sweetest / By those who ne’er succeed.” Whether her solitary existence was the result of severe eye trouble, aching despair generated by her love for a married minister, or fear of her possessive father, Dickinson’s isolation and lifelong religious doubts led her, in the “­ solitude of space . . . ​that polar privacy,” to probe the “white heat” of her h ­ eartbreak and disappointment in ways unusual for the time. Her ­often-​­abstract themes were elemental: life, death, fear, loneliness, nature, and above all, the withdrawal of God, “a distant, stately lover” who no longer could be found.

 edgar allan poe

 Edgar Allan Poe was even more fascinated by the deepening menace of death. Born in Boston in 1809 and orphaned as a child, he was raised by foster parents (the Allans, who gave him his middle name) in Richmond, Virginia. Poe was a misfit who led a stormy life. Although a top student and popular storyteller at the University of Virginia, he left the

Romanticism in America  525


 school after ten months, having racked up excessive gambling debts. After a ­two-​­year stint in the army, he enrolled at the U.S. Military Academy at West Point, where in 1831 he was expelled for missing classes and disobedience. After spending time in New York City and then in Baltimore, Poe relocated in 1835 to Richmond, where he became an assistant editor of the Southern Literary Messenger. He secretly married Virginia Clemm, his ­thirteen-​­year-​ ­old cousin, claiming that she was ­twenty-​­one. They moved to Philadelphia in 1837, where he edited magazines and wrote scathing reviews and terrifying mystery stories. As the creator of the detective story, his influence on literature has been enormous. In 1844, Poe moved to New York City. The following year, he published “The Raven,” a poem about a man who, “once upon a midnight dreary,” having lost his lover, a “sainted maiden” named Lenore, responds to a rapping at his door, only to find “darkness there and nothing more.” Scanning the darkness, “dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before,” he confronts a silence punctuated only by his mumbled query, “Lenore?” The man closes the door, only to hear the strange knocking again. Both angered and perplexed, he flings open the door and, “with many a flirt and flutter,” in flies a raven, that “grim, ungainly, ghastly, gaunt, and ominous bird of yore.” The raven utters but one haunting word: “Nevermore.” “The Raven” was so popular that Poe became a household name across America, although he received only two dollars for publishing the poem. In 1847, however, tragedy struck when Poe’s young wife died of tuberculosis. Thereafter, he was seduced as much by alcohol and drug abuse as by writing. He died at age forty of mysterious causes. Poe left behind an extraordinary collection of “unworldly” tales and haunting poems. He used horror to explore the darkest corners of human psychology and to satisfy his lifelong obsession with death. To him, fear was the most powerful emotion, so he focused on making the grotesque and the supernatural seem disturbingly real. Anyone who has read “The T ­ ell-​­Tale Heart” or “The Pit and the Pendulum” can testify to his success.

 herman melville

 Herman Melville, the author of ­Moby-​­Dick, was a New Yorker who went to sea as a youth. After eighteen months aboard a whaler, he arrived in the Marquesas Islands, in the South Seas, and jumped ship with a companion. He spent several weeks with natives in “the valley of the Typees” before signing on with an Australian whaler. He joined a mutiny in Tahiti and finally returned home as a seaman aboard a U.S. Navy frigate. An account of his exotic adventures, Typee (1846), became an instant success, which he repeated in Omoo (1847).

 526  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 In 1851, the t­ hirty-​­two-​­year-​­old Melville produced ­Moby-​­Dick, one of the world’s greatest novels. In the story of Captain Ahab’s obsessive quest for an “accursed” white whale that had devoured his leg, Melville explored the darker recesses of the soul. On one level, the book is a ripping good yarn of adventure on the high seas. On another level, however, it explores the unfathomable depths and darkness of human complexity, as the vengeful Ahab’s crazed obsession with finding and killing the massive white whale turns the captain into a monster of destruction who sacrifices his ship, The Pequod, and his crew.

 walt whitman

 The most controversial writer during the nineteenth century was Walt Whitman, a New York journalist and poet. The swaggering Whitman was a ­self-​­promoting, robust personality. After meeting Whitman, Thoreau wrote that he “was not only eager to talk about himself but reluctant to have the conversation stray from the subject for long.” Unlike Thoreau, Whitman did not fear “the age of steam” and wrote excitedly about industrial development, urban life, working men, sailors, and “simple humanity.” Born in 1819 on a Long Island farm, Whitman moved with his family to Brooklyn, where he worked as a carpenter, teacher, Democratic party activist, and editor of the Brooklyn Eagle. He frequently took the ferry across the East River to bustling Manhattan, where he was fascinated by the city’s restless energy. By the time he met Ralph Waldo Emerson, Whitman had been “simmering, simmering,” but Emerson “brought him to a boil” with his emphasis on defying tradition and celebrating the commonplaces of life, including sexuality and the body. All of these themes found their way into Whitman’s controversial first book of unconvenWalt Whitman This engraving of a tional, ­free-​­verse poems, Leaves of ­thirty-​­seven-​­year-​­old Walt Whitman Grass (1855). In its first year, it sold appeared in his acclaimed poetry all of ten copies. One reviewer called collection Leaves of Grass. it “an intensely vulgar, nay, absolutely

Romanticism in America  527


 beastly book.” Leaves of Grass, however, became more influential with each passing year. The brash Whitman introduced his book by declaring that “I celebrate myself, and sing myself.” He was unapologetically “an American, one of the roughs . . . ​disorderly, fleshy, and sensual . . . ​eating, drinking, and breeding.” Like Emerson, he was a ­self-​­proclaimed pioneer on behalf of “a new mightier world, a varied world,” a bustling “world of labor” dignified by “common people.” His poems were remarkable for their energy, exuberance, and intimacy, and were seasoned with frank sexuality and homoerotic overtones. They expressed the color and texture of American democracy, “immense in passion, pulse, and power.” Thoreau, for one, viewed Whitman as a liberating force in American culture and described him as “the greatest democrat the world has seen.” Although Leaves of Grass was banned in Boston because of its explicit sexuality, Emerson found it “the most extraordinary piece of wit and wisdom that America has yet contributed.” More conventional literary critics, however, shuddered at the shocking “grossness” of Whitman’s homosexual references (“manly love”; “the love of comrades”; “for the friend I love lay sleeping by my side”). Yet Whitman could never be truly honest about such matters, for homosexuality was a felony in the nineteenth century. In the colonial period, at least five men had been executed for “sodomy,” and many states retained the death penalty in the nineteenth century as the most severe punishment for “crimes against nature.” (Thomas Jefferson had unsuccessfully urged that castration be substituted as the punishment in Virginia.)

 newspapers The flowering of American literature coincided with a massive expansion in newspaper readership sparked by rapid improvements in printing technology. The emerging availability of newspapers costing only a penny transformed daily reading into a form of popular entertainment. The “penny dailies,” explained one editor,

Politics in an Oyster House (1848)
 Commissioned by social activist John H. B. Latrobe, this painting captures the public debates that were fueled by newspapers and magazines.

 528  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 “are to be found in every street, lane, and alley; in every hotel, tavern, countinghouse, [and] shop.” By 1850, the United States had more newspapers than any nation in the world, and they forged a network of communications across the republic. As readership soared, the content of the papers expanded beyond political news and commentary to include society gossip, sports, and reports of sensational crimes and accidents. The proliferation of newspapers was largely a northern and western phenomenon, as literacy rates in the South lagged behind those of the rest of the country.

The Reform Impulse
 In 1842, the United States was awash in reform movements led by dreamers and activists who saw social injustice or immorality and fought to correct it. Lyman Beecher, a champion of evangelical Christian revivalism (as well as the father of writer Harriet Beecher Stowe), stressed that the Second Great Awakening was not focused simply on promoting individual conversions; it was also intended to “reform human society.” While an impulse to “perfect” people and society helped excite the reform movements, social and economic changes invigorated many reformers, most of whom were women. The rise of an urban middle class enabled growing numbers of women to hire cooks and maids, thus freeing them to devote more time to societal concerns. Many women used their free time to join churches and charitable organizations, most of which were led by men. Both women and men belonging to evangelical societies fanned out across America to organize Sunday schools, spread the gospel, and distribute Bibles to the children of the working poor. Other reformers tackled issues such as awful conditions in prisons and workplaces, care of the disabled, temperance (reducing the consumption of alcoholic beverages), women’s rights, and the abolition of slavery. Transcendentalists broadened their initial emphasis on individual perfectionism to include reforms designed to improve the lot of the poor, the disenfranchised, and the enslaved. That these earnest social reformers often met resistance, persecution, violence, and even death testified to the sincerity of their convictions and the power of their example. As Ralph Waldo Emerson said, “Never mind the ridicule, never mind the defeat, up again old heart!” For there is “victory yet for all justice.”

 temperance

 The temperance crusade was the most widespread of the reform movements, in large part because many people argued that most social problems were rooted in alcohol abuse. William Cobbett, an English reformer who traveled in the United States, noted in 1819 that one could “go into hardly

The Reform Impulse  529


 any man’s house without being asked to drink wine or spirits, even in the ­morning.” In 1826, a group of ministers in Boston organized the American Society for the Promotion of Temperance, which sponsored lectures, press campaigns, and the formation of local and state societies. A favorite device was to ask each person who took the pledge to put by his or her signature a letter T for “total abstinence.” With that a new word entered the language: teetotaler. In 1833, the society held a national convention in Philadelphia, where the American Temperance Union was formed. Like nearly every reform movement of the day, temperance had a wing of absolutists. They would accept no compromise with Demon Rum and passed a resolution that liquor ought to be prohibited by law. The Temperance Union, at its spring convention in 1836, called for abstinence from all alcoholic ­beverages—​­which caused moderates to abstain from the movement.

 prisons and asylums

 The temperance crusade A ­mid-​ ­nineteenth-century temperance banner depicts a young man being tempted by a woman offering him a glass of wine.

 The Romantic impulse often included the liberal belief that people are innately good and capable of perfection. Such an optimistic view brought about major changes in the treatment of prisoners, the disabled, and dependent children. Public institutions (often called asylums) emerged for the treatment of social ills. If removed from society, the theory went, the needy and deviant could be made whole again. Unhappily, however, the underfunded and understaffed asylums often became breeding grounds for brutality and neglect. Gradually, the idea of the ­penitentiary—​­a place where the guilty paid for their crimes but also underwent ­rehabilitation—​­developed as a new approach to reforming criminals. An early model of the system was the Auburn Penitentiary, which opened in New York in 1816. The prisoners at Auburn had separate cells and gathered only for meals and group labor. Discipline was severe. The men marched in lockstep and were never put f­ ace-​­to-​­face or allowed to talk. But they were reasonably secure

 530  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 from abuse by their fellow prisoners. The system, its advocates argued, had a ­beneficial effect on the prisoners and saved money, since the facility’s workshops supplied prison needs and produced goods for sale at a profit. By 1840, there were twelve ­Auburn-​­type penitentiaries across the nation. The Romantic reform impulse also found an outlet in the care of the insane. Before 1800, the insane were usually confined at home, with hired keepers, or in jails or almshouses, where homeless debtors were housed. In the years after 1815, however, asylums that separated the disturbed from the criminal began to appear. The most important figure in boosting awareness of the plight of the mentally ill was Dorothea Lynde Dix. A pious Boston schoolteacher, she was asked to instruct a ­Sunday-​­school class at the East Cambridge House of Correction in 1841. There she found a roomful of insane people who had been completely neglected. The scene so disturbed Dix that she began a t­ wo-​­year investigation of jails and almshouses in Massachusetts. In a report to the state legislature in 1843, Dix revealed that insane people were confined “in cages, closets, cellars, stalls, pens! Chained, naked, beaten with rods, and lashed into obedience.” She won the support of leading reformers and proceeded to carry her campaign on behalf of “the miserable, the desolate, and the outcast” throughout the country and abroad. In the process, she helped to transform social attitudes toward mental illness.

 women’s rights

 While countless ­ middle-​­ class women devoted t­hemselves to improving the quality of life in America, some argued that women should first focus on enhancing home life. In 1841, Harriet Beecher Stowe’s sister, Catharine Beecher, a leader in the education movement, published A Treatise on Domestic Economy, which became the leading handbook promot­ iddle-​­class ing the cult of domesticity, a powerful ideology that called upon m women to accept and celebrate their role as manager of the household and the children, separate from the man’s sphere of work outside the home. While Beecher upheld high standards in women’s education, she and many others argued that young women should be trained not for the workplace but in the domestic ­arts—​­managing a kitchen, running a household, and nurturing the children. Women, explained a Philadelphia doctor, were crucial to the future of the Republic because they instructed their children “in the principles of liberty and government.” The official status of women during the first half of the nineteenth century remained much as it had been in the colonial era. They were barred from the ministry and most other professions. Higher education was hardly an option.

The Reform Impulse  531


 Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Susan B. Anthony Stanton (left, in 1856) was a young mother who organized the Seneca Falls Convention, while Anthony (right, in 1848) started as an ­anti-​­slavery and temperance activist in her twenties. The two would meet in 1851 and form a lifelong partnership in the fight for women’s suffrage.

 Women could not serve on juries, nor could they vote. A wife often had no control over her property or even her children. She could not make a will, sign a contract, or bring suit in court without her husband’s permission. Her subordinate legal status was similar to that of a minor or a free black.

 seneca falls

 Gradually, however, women began to protest, and men began to listen. The organized movement for women’s rights emerged in 1840, when the ­anti-​­slavery movement split over the question of women’s right to participate. In 1848, two prominent advocates of women’s rights, Lucretia Mott, a Philadelphia Quaker abolitionist, and Elizabeth Cady Stanton, a New York abolitionist, called a convention of men and women to gather in Stanton’s hometown of Seneca Falls, New York, to discuss “the social, civil, and religious condition and rights of women.” On July 19, 1848, when the Seneca Falls Convention convened, revolution was in the air. In Italy, Germany, and other European states, militant nationalists, including many women, rebelled against monarchies and promoted unification. In France, the Society for the Emancipation for Women demanded

 532  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 that women receive equal political rights. In April, the French government abolished slavery in its Caribbean colonies, and in June, European feminists called for “the complete, radical abolition of all the privileges of sex, of birth, of race, of rank, and of fortune.” The activists at Seneca Falls did not go that far, but they did issue a clever paraphrase of the Declaration of Independence. The Declaration of Rights and Sentiments proclaimed that “all men and women are created equal.” All laws that placed women “in a position inferior to that of men, are contrary to the great precept of nature, and therefore of no force or authority.” Its most controversial demand was the right to vote. Such ambitious goals and strong language were too radical for most of the 300 delegates, and only about a third of them signed the Declaration of Rights and Sentiments. One newspaper dismissed the convention as “the most shocking and unnatural incident ever recorded in the history of womanity.” The Philadelphia Public Ledger sneeringly asked why women would want to climb down from their domestic pedestal and get involved with the dirty world of politics: “A woman is nothing. A wife is everything. A pretty girl is equal to ten thousand men, and a mother is, next to God, all powerful.” Despite such opposition, however, the Seneca Falls gathering represented an important first step in the evolving campaign for women’s rights. From 1850 until the Civil War, leaders of the women’s rights movement held annual conventions, delivered lectures, and circulated petitions. The movement struggled in the face of meager funds and widespread a­ nti-​­feminist sentiment. A mother and housewife criticized the women reformers for “aping mannish manners” and wearing “absurd and barbarous attire.” The typical feminist, she claimed, “struts and strides, and thinks that she proves herself superior to the rest of her sex.” The women’s movement was eventually successful because of the work of a few undaunted women.

 susan b. anthony

 Susan B. Anthony, already active in temperance and ­anti-​­slavery groups, joined the crusade in the 1850s. Unlike Stanton and Mott, she was unmarried and therefore able to devote most of her attention to the women’s crusade. As one observer put it, Stanton “forged the thunderbolts and Miss Anthony hurled them.” Both were young when the movement started, and both lived into the twentieth century, focusing after the Civil War on demands for women’s suffrage (the right to vote). Women did not gain the vote in the nineteenth century, but they did make legal gains. In 1839, Mississippi became the first state to grant married women control over their property; by the 1860s, eleven more states had done so. Still, the only jobs open to educated women in any number were nursing and

The Reform Impulse  533


 teaching. Both professions brought relatively lower status and pay than “men’s work,” despite the skills, training, and responsibilities involved.

 early public schools

 Early America, like most rural societies, offered few educational opportunities for the masses. That changed in the first half of the nineteenth century as reformers lobbied for public schools to serve all children, rich or poor. The working poor wanted free schools to give their children an equal chance to pursue the American dream. In 1830, the Workingmen’s Party of Philadelphia called for “a system of education that shall embrace equally all the children of the state, of every rank and condition.” Education, people argued, would improve manners while reducing crime and poverty. Aw ­ ell-​­informed, ­well-​­trained citizenry was considered one of the basic premises of a republic. A Vermont newspaper editor stressed that education was “the standing army of Republics.” If political power resided with the ­people, as the Constitution asserted, then the citizenry needed to be well educated. By 1830, however, no state had a public school system. Horace Mann of Massachusetts, a state legislator and attorney, led the early drive for statewide, ­tax-​­supported public school systems. He proposed that these schools be free to all children regardless of class, race, or ­ethnicity—​ ­including immigrant children. He sponsored the creation of a state board of education, and then served as its leader. Universal access to education, Mann argued, “was the great equalizer of the conditions of ­men—​­the b ­ alance-​­wheel of the social machinery.” Mann went on to promote the first ­state-​­supported “normal school” for the training of teachers, a state association of teachers, and a minimum school year of six months. He saw the public school system as a way not only to ensure that everyone had a basic level of knowledge and skills but also to reinforce values such as hard work and clean living. “If we do not prepare children to become good citizens, if we do not enrich their minds with knowledge,” Mann warned, “then our republic must go down to destruction.” Such a holistic education, Mann argued, would enhance social stability and equal opportunity, as well as give women opportunities for rewarding work outside the home, as teachers. Mann said they could become “mothers away from home” for the children they taught. By the 1840s, most states in the North and Midwest, but not the South, had joined the public school movement. The initial conditions for public education, however, were seldom ideal. Funds for buildings, books, and equipment were limited; teachers were poorly paid and often poorly prepared. Most ­students going beyond the elementary grades attended private academies,

 534  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 often organized by churches. Such schools, begun in colonial days, multiplied until there were more than 6,000 of them by 1850. In 1821, the Boston English High School opened as the nation’s first free public secondary school, set up mainly for students not going on to college. By a law of 1827, Massachusetts required every town of 500 or more residents to have a high school; in towns of 4,000 or more, the school had to offer Latin, Greek, rhetoric, and other ­college-​­preparatory courses. Public high schools became well established only after the Civil War. In 1860 there were barely 300 in the whole nation. By 1850, half of the white children between ages five and nineteen were enrolled in schools, the highest percentage in the world. But very few of those students were southerners. Public schools were scarce in the South until after the Civil War. In most states, enslaved children were prohibited from learning to read and write or attend school. A former slave recalled that his owner “didn’t teach ‘em nuthin’ but work.” The South had some 500,000 illiterate whites, more than half the total in the country. In the South, North Carolina led the way in s­ tate-​­supported

 The George Barrell Emerson School, Boston (ca. 1850) Although higher education for women initially met with some resistance, in the 1820s and 1830s, “seminaries” like this one were established to teach women mathematics, physics, and history, as well as music, art, and social graces.

The Reform Impulse  535


 e­ ducation, enrolling more than two thirds of its white ­school-​­age population by 1860. But the school year was only four months long because of the rural state’s need for children to do farmwork. The prolonged disparities between North and South in the number and quality of educational opportunities help explain the growing economic and cultural differences between the two regions. Then, as now, undereducated people were more likely to remain economically deprived, less healthy, and less engaged in political life.

 food and sex

 The widespread reform impulse in the early nineteenth century excited causes and cranks of all sorts, including an array of health reformers, the most popular of whom was Sylvester Graham, a controversial ­preacher-​­turned-​­lecturer who blamed most of Americans’ problems on their bad eating and drinking habits. Born in 1794 in West Suffield, Connecticut, Graham was the youngest of seventeen children. Soon after his minister father died, in 1796, his mother broke down under the strain of ­single-​­parenting and young Sylvester was farmed out to be raised by “strangers.” As a young man he worked as a farmhand, clerk, and teacher before attending Amherst College in Massachusetts. He was expelled for his aggressive eccentricities, which did not prevent him from becoming a Presbyterian minister. But religion inspired Graham less than nutrition did. He soon gave up preaching the Gospel of Christ in order to preach the gospel of bran and fiber. Although he had no medical training, Graham became the nation’s leading health reformer after a cholera epidemic ravaged the nation in 1832 and led panicked people to embrace his odd explanations for the killer disease. Graham attributed cholera to people eating chicken pot pie and engaging in “excessive lewdness.” Thereafter, on the lecture circuit, in books, and in Graham’s Journal of Health and Longevity, Graham preached convincingly against the dangers of alcohol and coffee, white flour, meat, gluttony, obesity, and body odor. Graham’s “system” for a healthier America called for a diet of whole grains, fresh fruits, and nuts. The Graham diet banned all meats and ­spices—​­including p ­ epper and ­salt—​ ­as well as butter, cream, and soups. Alcohol and tobacco were also prohibited. The centerpiece of Graham’s celebrated vegetarian diet was the “Graham cracker,” made of coarsely ground wheat bathed in molasses and baked. Graham stressed that daily meals of his crackers needed to be precisely six hours apart, with no snacking in between. The “Graham system” also prescribed fresh air, daily bathing in cold water, drinking only when thirsty (not with meals), and singing and dancing for exercise. He discouraged “excessive” sexual activity, meaning more than once a week for married couples, because it would cause indigestion, headache, feebleness of circulation, pulmonary

 536  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 c­ onsumption, spinal diseases, epilepsy, and insanity. Like a cult leader, Graham urged his followers to “avoid medicine and p ­ hysicians—​­if you value your life.” The vain and egotistical Graham (most of his siblings disowned him) became one of the most famed and hated of the professional reformers. Butchers and bakers threatened to kill him, and many people laughed at his ideas. Yet others, called Grahamites, passionately embraced his health system. There were Grahamite hotels in New York City, Boston, and Philadelphia, as well as stores, boarding houses, college dining halls, and a newspaper promoting his diet and ideas. One of Graham’s followers called him an “eccentric and wayward genius.”

Utopian Communities
 Amid the pervasive climate of reform, the quest for u ­ topia—​­communities with innovative social and economic ­relationships—​­flourished. Plans for ideal communities had long been an American passion, and more than 100 utopian communities sprang up between 1800 and 1900. Many of them were communitarian experiments that emphasized the welfare of the entire community rather than individual freedom. Some experimented with “free love,” socialism, and special diets.

 the shakers

 Communities founded by the Shakers (officially the United Society of Believers in Christ’s Second Appearing) proved to be long lasting. Ann Lee (known as Mother Ann Lee) arrived in New York from England with eight followers in 1774. Believing religious fervor to be a sign of inspiration from the Holy Ghost, Mother Ann and her followers had strange fits in which they saw visions and issued prophecies (predictions about the future). These manifestations later evolved into a ritual d ­ ance—​­hence the name “Shakers.” Shaker doctrine held God to be a dual personality. In Christ, the masculine side was revealed; in Mother Ann, the feminine element. That Mother Ann preached celibacy to prepare Shakers for the perfection that was promised them in heaven helps explain why their membership declined over time. Mother Ann died in 1784, but the group found new leaders, and the movement spread from New York into New England, Ohio, and Kentucky. By 1830 about twenty groups were flourishing. In these Shaker communities all property was held in common. Shaker farms were among the nation’s leading sources of garden seed and medicinal herbs, and many of their products, especially furniture, were prized for their simple beauty.

The Reform Impulse  537


 oneida

 John Humphrey Noyes, founder of the Oneida Community, had a very different vision of the ideal community. The son of a Vermont congressman, Noyes attended Dartmouth College and Yale Divinity School. But in 1834 he was expelled from Yale and his license to preach was revoked after he announced that he was “perfect” and free of all sin. In 1836 Noyes gathered a group of “Perfectionists” around his home in Putney, Vermont. Ten years later, Noyes announced a new doctrine, “complex marriage,” which meant that every man in the community was married to every woman, and vice versa. “In a holy community,” he claimed, “there is no more reason why sexual intercourse should be restrained by law, than why eating and drinking should be.” Authorities thought otherwise, and Noyes was charged with adultery for practicing his theology of “free love” (he coined the term). He fled to New York and in 1848 established the Oneida Community, which had more than 200 members by 1851 and became famous for its production of fine silverware.

 brook farm

 Brook Farm in Massachusetts was the most celebrated utopian community because it grew out of the transcendental movement. George Ripley, a Unitarian minister and transcendentalist, conceived of Brook Farm as a kind of e­ arly-​­day think tank, combining high philosophy and plain living, and manual labor. In 1841, he and several dozen l­ike-​­minded utopians moved to the 175-acre farm eight miles southwest of Boston. Brook Farm became America’s first secular utopian community. One of its members, novelist Nathaniel Hawthorne, called it “our beautiful scheme of a noble and unselfish life” (he later would satirize the community in his novel The Blithedale Romance). Its residents shared the tasks of maintaining the buildings, tending the fields, and preparing the meals. They also organized picnics, dances, lectures, and discussions. Emerson, Thoreau, and Margaret Fuller were among the visiting lecturers. In 1846, however, Brook Farm’s main building burned down, and the community spirit died in the ashes. In the end, utopian communities had little impact on the outside world, where reformers wrestled with the sins of the multitudes. Among all the targets of the reformers’ zeal, one great evil would take precedence over the others: human bondage. Transcendentalist reformer Theodore Parker declared that slavery was “the blight of this nation, the curse of the North and the curse of the South.” The paradox of American freedom being coupled with American slavery, what novelist Herman Melville called “the world’s fairest hope linked with man’s foulest crime,” would inspire the climactic crusade of the age, abolitionism, which would ultimately sweep the nation into an epic civil war.

 538  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 The ­A nti-​­S lavery Movement The men who drafted the U.S. Constitution in 1787 hoped to keep the new nation from splitting apart over the question of slavery. To that end, they negotiated compromises that avoided dealing with the issue. But most of the founders knew that there eventually would be a day of reckoning. That day approached as the nineteenth century unfolded, and growing numbers of Americans decided that the daily horrors of slavery must come to an end.

 early opposition to slavery The first organized emancipation movement appeared in 1816 with the formation of the American Colonization Society (ACS) in Washington, D.C., whose mission was to raise funds to “repatriate” free blacks back to Africa. Its supporters included James Madison, James Monroe, Andrew Jackson, Henry Clay, John Marshall, and Daniel Webster. Some supported the colonization movement because they opposed slavery; others saw it as a way to get rid of free blacks. “We must save the Negro,” as one missionary explained, “or the Negro will ruin us.” White supremacy remained a powerful assumption, even among many ­anti-​­slavery reformers. Leaders of the free black community denounced the colonization idea from the start. The United States, they stressed, was their native land, and they had as valid a claim on U.S. citizenship as anyone else. Nevertheless, the ACS acquired land on the Ivory Coast of West Africa, and on February 6, 1820, the Elizabeth sailed from New York with the first ­eighty-​­eight emigrants who formed the nucleus of a new nation, the Republic of Liberia. Thereafter, however, the African colonization movement waned. During the 1830s, only 2,638 African Americans migrated to Liberia. In all, only about 15,000 resettled in Africa. from gradualism to abolitionism

 The fight against slavery started in Great Britain in the late eighteenth century, and the movement’s success in ending British involvement in the African slave trade helped spur the ­anti-​­slavery cause in America. British abolitionists lectured across the northern United States and often bought freedom for runaway slaves. At the same time, most of the leading American abolitionists visited Great Britain and came away inspired by the breadth and depth of ­anti-​­slavery organizations there. The British example helped convince black and white leaders of the cause in America to adopt an aggressive new strategy in the early 1830s. Equally important was the realization that slavery in the cotton states of the South was not dying out; it was rapidly growing. This hard reality led to a change

The A
 ­ nti-­Slavery Movement  539

 in tactics among a­nti-​­slavery organizations, many of which were energized by evangelical religions and the emerging social activism of transcendentalism. Their initial efforts to promote a gradual end to slavery by prohibiting it in the western territories and using moral persuasion to convince owners to free their slaves gradually gave way to demands for immediate abolition everywhere.

 william lloyd garrison

 A white Massachusetts activist named William Lloyd Garrison drove the William Lloyd Garrison A militant movement. In 1831, free blacks helped abolitionist and a committed pacifist. convince Garrison to launch an a­ nti-​ ­slavery newspaper, the Liberator, which became the voice of the nation’s first civil rights movement. In the ­Boston-​­based newspaper’s first issue, Garrison condemned “the popular but pernicious doctrine of gradual emancipation.” He dreamed of true equality in all spheres of American life, including the status of women. In pursuing that dream, he vowed to be “as harsh as truth, and as uncompromising as justice. . . . ​I am in e­ arnest—​­I will not e­ quivocate—​­I will not ­excuse—​­I will not retreat a single ­inch—​­and i will be heard.” Garrison’s courage in denouncing slavery forced the issue onto the national agenda and outraged slaveholders in the South, as well as some whites in the North. In 1835, a mob of angry whites dragged him through the streets of Boston. The South Carolina and Georgia legislatures promised a reward to anyone who kidnapped Garrison and brought him south for trial. A southern slaveholder warned him “to desist your infamous endeavors to instill into the minds of the negroes the idea that ‘men must be free.’” The violence of the southern reaction wrecked the assumption of “Garrisonians” that moral righteousness would trump evil and that their fellow Americans would listen to reason. The pacifist Garrison remained opposed to the use of force. “We do not preach rebellion,” he stressed. The prospect “of a bloody insurrection in the South fills us with dismay,” but “if any people were ever justified in throwing off the yoke of their tyrants, the slaves are the people.” During the 1830s, Garrison became the nation’s most unyielding foe of slavery. Through his unflagging efforts, he helped make the ­impossible—​ ­abolition—​­seem possible to more and more people. Two wealthy New York

 540  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 City evangelical silk merchants, Arthur and Lewis Tappan, provided financial support for Garrison and the Liberator. In 1833, they joined with Garrison and a group of Quaker reformers, free blacks, and evangelicals to organize the American ­Anti-​­Slavery Society (AASS). That same year, Parliament freed some 800,000 enslaved colonial p ­ eoples throughout the British Empire by passing the Emancipation Act, whereby slaveholders were paid to give up their “human property.” In 1835, the Tappans hired revivalist Charles G. Finney to head the a­ nti-​­slavery faculty at Oberlin, a new college in northern Ohio that would be the first to admit black students. The American ­Anti-​­Slavery Society, financed by the Tappans, created a national network of newspapers, offices, and 300 chapters, almost all of which were affiliated with a local Christian church. By 1840, some 160,000 people belonged to AASS, which stressed that “slaveholding is a heinous crime in the sight of God, and that the duty, safety, and best interests of all concerned, require its immediate abandonment.” The AASS even argued that blacks should have full social and civil rights. In 1835, the group began flooding the South with a­ nti-​­slavery pamphlets and newspapers. The ­anti-​­slavery materials so enraged southern slaveholders that a Louisiana community offered a $50,000 reward for the capture of the “notorious abolitionist, Arthur Tappan, of New York.” Post offices throughout the South began destroying what was called “­anti-​­slavery propaganda.”

 david walker The most radical figure among the largely white Garrisonians was David Walker, a free black man who owned a used clothing store in Boston. In 1829, he published his Appeal to the Colored Citizens of the World, a pamphlet that denounced the hypocrisy of Christians in the South for defending slavery and urged slaves to follow the example of the Haitian rebels and revolt against the planters. “The whites want slaves, and want us for their slaves,” Walker warned, “but some of them will curse the day they ever saw us.” Walker challenged African Americans, slave and free, to act like “men” and use the “crushing arm of power” to gain their freedom. “Woe, woe will be to you,” he threatened whites, “if we have to obtain our freedom by fighting.” Copies of Walker’s Appeal were secretly carried to the South by black sailors, but whites in major cities seized the “vile” pamphlet. In 1830, the state of Mississippi outlawed efforts to “print, write, circulate, or put forth . . . ​any book, paper, magazine, pamphlet, handbill or circular” intended to arouse the “colored population” by “exciting riots and rebellion.” a split in the movement As the abolitionist movement spread, debates over tactics intensified. The Garrisonians, for example, felt that slavery had corrupted virtually every aspect of American life. They therefore

 The ­A nti-­Slavery Movement  541

 embraced every important reform movement of the day: abolition, temperance, pacifism, and women’s rights. Garrison’s unconventional religious ideas and social ideals led him to break with the established Protestant churches, which to his mind were in league with slavery; the federal government all the more so. The U.S. Constitution, he charged, was “a covenant with death and an agreement with hell.” Garrison was such a moral purist that he even refused to vote and encouraged others to do the same, arguing that the American republic could not continue to proclaim the ideal of liberty while tolerating the reality of slavery. He fiercely believed that the South could be shamed into ending slavery. Other reformers were more practical and ­single-​­minded. They saw American society as fundamentally sound and concentrated on purging it of slavery. Garrison struck them as an unrealistic fanatic whose radicalism hurt the cause. Even Harriet Beecher Stowe, who would write Uncle Tom’s Cabin (1852), called Garrisonians, most of whom were Unitarians, Quakers, or transcendentalists, “moral ­mono-​­maniacs.” The powerful Tappan brothers broke with Garrison over religion. They argued that the ­anti-​­slavery movement should be led only by men of “evangelical piety,” and they declared that the Unitarians and Universalists in New England failed to meet that standard.

 the grimké sisters

 A showdown between the rival ­anti-​­slavery camps erupted in 1840 over the issue of women’s rights. Women had joined the abolition movement from the start, but largely in groups without men. During the early nineteenth century, women were rarely allowed to speak to organizations that included men. Then the activities of the Grimké sisters brought women’s rights to center stage. Sarah and Angelina Grimké, daughters of a wealthy South Carolina family, grew up being served by slaves. In 1821, soon after her father’s death, Sarah moved from Charleston to Philadelphia, joined the Society of Friends (Quakers), and renounced slavery. Angelina soon joined her. In 1835, the sisters joined the abolitionist movement, speaking to northern women’s groups in what were called “parlor meetings.” After they appealed to southern Christian women to end slavery, the mayor of Charleston told their mother that they would be jailed if they ever returned home. The Grimké sisters traveled widely, speaking first to audiences of women and eventually to groups of both sexes. Their unconventional (“promiscuous”) behavior in speaking to m ­ ixed-​­gender audiences prompted sharp criticism from ministers in the a­ nti-​­slavery movement. The chairman of the Connecticut ­Anti-​­Slavery Society declared that “no woman shall speak or vote. . . . ​It is enough for women to rule at home.” Catharine Beecher reminded the Grimké sisters that women occupied “a subordinate relation in society to the other sex”

 542  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 Sarah (left) and Angelina (right) Grimké After moving away from their South Carolina slaveholding family, the Grimké sisters devoted themselves to abolitionism and feminism.

 and that they should limit their activities to the “domestic and social circle” rather than public organizations. Angelina Grimké firmly rejected such arguments. For centuries, she noted, women had been raised to view themselves as “inferior creatures.” Now, she insisted, “It is a woman’s right to have a voice in all laws and regulations by which she is to be governed, whether in church or in state.” Soon, she and her sister began linking their efforts to free the slaves with their desire to free women from centuries of male domination. “Men and women are created equal!” Sarah Grimké said. “Whatever is right for man to do is right for woman.”

 the role of women

 The debate over the role of women in the ­anti-​­slavery movement finally exploded at the American A ­ nti-​­Slavery Society’s meeting in 1840, where the Garrisonians convinced a majority of delegates that women should participate equally in the organization. The Tappans and their supporters walked out and formed the American and Foreign A ­ nti-​ S­ lavery Society. A third faction of the American ­Anti-​­Slavery Society had grown skeptical that the nonviolent “moral suasion” promoted by Garrison would ever lead

 The ­A nti-­Slavery Movement  543

 to abolition. They decided that political action was the most effective way to pursue their goal. In 1840, activists formed the Liberty party in an effort to elect an American president who would abolish slavery. Their nominee, James Gillespie Birney, executive secretary of the American A ­ nti-​­Slavery Society, was a former Alabama slaveholder turned abolitionist. His slogan was “vote as you pray, and pray as you vote.” The platform called for an end to slavery in the western territories and the District of Columbia and a ban on intrastate slave trading. Yet the Liberty party found few supporters. In the 1840 election, Birney polled only 7,000 votes. In 1844, however, he would win 60,000. From that time forward, an ­anti-​­slavery party contested every national election until the Thirteenth Amendment officially ended slavery in 1865.

 Black ­A nti-​­S lavery Activity Although many whites worked courageously to end slavery, most of them, unlike Garrison, still insisted that blacks were socially inferior to whites. Freedom for slaves, in other words, did not mean social equality, and many white abolitionists expected free blacks to take a backseat in the movement.

 william wells brown

 Yet free African Americans were active in white ­anti-​­slavery societies. Former slaves such as Henry Bibb and William Wells Brown, both runaways from Kentucky, and Frederick Douglass, who had escaped from Maryland, became the most effective critics of the South’s “peculiar institution.” Much of the energy and appeal of the abolitionist movement derived from the compelling testimonies provided by former slaves. Brown was just twenty years old when he escaped from his owner, a ­steamboat pilot on the Ohio River. An Ohio Quaker named Wells Brown provided shelter to the runaway, and Brown adopted the man’s name in the process of forging a new identity as a free man. He settled in Cleveland, Ohio, where he was a dockworker. He married, had three children, and helped runaway slaves cross the border into Canada. By 1842, he had learned to read and write, begun to publish columns in abolitionist newspapers, and was in great demand as a speaker at a­ nti-​­slavery meetings. In 1847, Brown moved to Boston, where the Massachusetts A ­ nti-​­Slavery Society hired him as a traveling lecturer. That same year, the organization published Brown’s autobiography, Narrative of William W. Brown, A Former Slave, Written by Himself, which became a best seller. Brown gave thousands of speeches in America and Europe calling for an end to slavery and equality for both blacks and women. He repeatedly

 544  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 stressed that African Americans were “endowed with those intellectual and amiable qualities which adorn and dignify human nature.”

 frederick douglass

 Frederick Douglass was an even more effective spokesman for abolitionism. Having escaped from slavery in Baltimore, Maryland, Douglass made his way to Massachusetts, where he began speaking at ­anti-​­slavery meetings in black churches. Through his writings and dazzling presentations, he became the ­best-​­known black man in America. “I appear before the immense assembly this evening as a thief and a robber,” he told a Massachusetts group in 1842. “I stole this head, these limbs, this body from my master, and ran off with them.” Fearful of capture after publishing his Narrative of the Life of Frederick Douglass, An American Slave, Written by Himself (1845), he left for an extended lecture tour of the British Isles, returning two years later with enough money to purchase his official freedom. He then started an abolitionist newspaper for blacks, the North Star, in Rochester, New York. He named the newspaper after the star that runaway slaves used to guide them at night toward freedom.

 sojourner truth

 The female counterpart to Frederick Douglass was Sojourner Truth. Born to enslaved parents in upstate New York in 1797, she was given the name Isabella “Bell” Hardenbergh but renamed herself in

 Frederick Douglass (left) and Sojourner Truth (right) Both former slaves, Douglass and Truth were leading African American abolitionists and captivating orators.

 The ­A nti-­Slavery Movement  545

 1843 after experiencing a conversation with God, who told her “to travel up and down the land” preaching against slavery. Having been a slave until she was freed in 1827, Sojourner Truth was able to speak with conviction and knowledge about the evils of the “peculiar institution” as well as the inequality of women. Truth traveled and spoke throughout the North during the 1840s and 1850s. As she told the Ohio Women’s Rights Convention in 1851, “I have plowed, and planted, and gathered into barns, and no man could head m ­ e—​ ­and ar’n’t I a woman? I have borne thirteen children, and seen ‘em mos’ all sold off into slavery, and when I cried out with a mother’s grief, none but Jesus ­heard—​­and ar’n’t I a woman?” Through such compelling testimony, Sojourner Truth demonstrated the powerful intersection of abolitionism and feminism. In the process, she tapped the distinctive energies that women brought to reformist causes. “If the first woman God ever made was strong enough to turn the world upside down all alone,” she concluded in her address to the Ohio gathering, “these women together ought to be able to turn it back, and get it right side up again!”

 the underground railroad

 Between 1810 and 1850, tens of thousands of southern slaves fled north. Runaway slaves would make their way, usually at night, from one “station” or safe house to the next. The organizations and the systems of safe houses and shelters along the routes to freedom were referred to as the Underground Railroad. The “conductors” helping the runaways included freeborn blacks, white abolitionists, former slaves, and Native Americans. Many were motivated by religious concerns. Quakers, Presbyterians, Methodists, and Baptists participated. In many northern cities, blacks and whites organized “vigilance committees” to thwart the slave catchers. In February 1851, Shadrach Minkins, a “stout, c­ opper-​­colored man” who worked as a waiter at a Boston coffee house, was seized by U.S. marshals who claimed that he was a runaway slave from Virginia. During a court hearing, black and white members of the ­anti-​­slavery Boston Vigilance and Safety Committee active in the Underground Railroad rushed in, overcame armed guards, and snatched “the trembling prey of the slave hunters.” An outraged President Millard Fillmore issued a proclamation demanding that citizens obey the law and that those responsible for “kidnapping” Minkins be prosecuted. None of the Bostonians charged in the case were convicted. A few courageous runaway slaves returned to the South to organize more escapes. Harriet Tubman, the most celebrated member of the Underground Railroad, was born a slave in Maryland in 1820 but escaped to Philadelphia in 1849. She would return to the South nineteen times to help some 300 fugitive

 546  CHAPTER 12  Religion, Romanticism, and Reform 1800–1860

 slaves, including her parents. She “never lost a passenger” during her legendary acts of bravery.

 elijah p. lovejoy

 Despite the growing efforts of a­ nti-​­slavery organizations, racism remained widespread in the North, especially among the ­working poor. Abolitionist speakers confronted hostile white crowds who ­disliked blacks or found a­ nti-​­slavery agitation bad for business. In 1837, a mob in Illinois killed Elijah P. Lovejoy, editor of an a­ nti-​­slavery newspaper, giving the movement a martyr to the causes of both abolition and freedom of the press. Lovejoy had begun his career as a Presbyterian minister in New England. After receiving a “sign by God” to focus his life on the “destruction of slavery,” he moved to St. Louis, in slaveholding Missouri, where his newspaper denounced alcohol, Catholicism, and slavery. When a ­pro-​­slavery mob destroyed his printing office, he moved across the Mississippi River to a warehouse in Alton, Illinois, where he tried to start an ­anti-​­slavery society. There mobs twice more destroyed his printing press. When a new press arrived, Lovejoy and several supporters armed themselves and took up defensive positions. On November 7, 1837, thugs began hurling stones and firing shots into the building. One of Lovejoy’s allies fired back, killing a rioter. The mob then set fire to the warehouse, shouting, “Kill every damned abolitionist as he leaves.” A shotgun blast killed Lovejoy, and his murder aroused a frenzy of indignation. At one of the hundreds of memorial services across the North, a grizzled John Brown rose, raised his right hand, and declared, “Here, before God, in the presence of these witnesses, from this time, I consecrate my life to the destruction of slavery!” Brown and other militants decided that only violence would dislodge the sin of slavery.

 abigail kelley

 The powerful appeal of abolitionism and the broader reform impulse is illustrated in the colorful life of Abigail “Abbie” Kelley. A teacher born in Pelham, Massachusetts, in 1811, she initially became a Grahamite, giving up coffee, alcohol, meat, and tea in favor of vegetables and Graham crackers. Soon thereafter, she attended a lecture by William Lloyd Garrison and embraced abolitionism, joining the Female ­Anti-​­Slavery Society. In 1837, she wrote her sister that she was supporting a variety of “moral e­ nterprises—​­Grahamism, Abolition, and Peace.” Kelley was a compelling speaker. In 1840, she was the first woman to be elected an officer in the American ­Anti-​­Slavery Society. Many male abolitionists were furious. One of them described Kelley as being one of those “women of masculine minds and aggressive tendencies . . . ​who cannot be satisfied in domestic life.” The prejudice she experienced among male officers revealed to her that she and other women “were manacled [chained] ourselves.”

 The ­A nti-­Slavery Movement  547

 During the 1850s, Kelley, while still a passionate abolitionist, began to champion women’s rights and temperance. She spoke at the fourth national woman’s rights convention in Cleveland. Lucy Stone, one of the women’s rights leaders, called Kelley a heroine who “stood in the thick of the fight for the slaves, and at the same time, she hewed out that path over which women are now walking toward their equal political rights.”

The Defense of Slavery
 The growing strength and visibility of the abolitionist movement coupled with the profitability of cotton growing prompted southerners to launch an aggressive defense of slavery. Some of them even called for the reopening of the African slave trade. During the 1830s and after, ­pro-​­slavery leaders worked out an elaborate rationale for what they considered the benefits of slavery. The Bible was frequently cited in support of slavery; had not the patriarchs of the Hebrew Bible held people in bondage? Had not Saint Paul advised servants to obey their masters and told a runaway servant to return to his master? And had not Jesus remained silent on the subject? Soon, even bolder arguments emerged. In February 1837, South Carolina’s John C. Calhoun, the most prominent southern political leader, told the Senate that slavery was “­good—​­a great good,” rooted in the Bible. He asserted that the “savage” Africans brought to America “had never existed in so comfortable, so respectable, or so civilized a condition, as that which is now enjoyed in the Southern states.” If slavery were abolished, Calhoun warned, the principle of white racial supremacy would be compromised. Calhoun and other defenders of slavery also claimed that blacks could not be expected to work under conditions of freedom. They were too shiftless, the argument went, and if freed, they would be a danger to themselves and to others. White workers, on the other hand, feared the competition for jobs if slaves were freed. Calhoun’s strident defense of slavery led Henry Clay of Kentucky, himself a slaveholder, to describe Calhoun as “a rigid, fanatic, ambitious, selfishly partisan and sectional turncoat with too much genius and too little common sense, who will either die a traitor or a madman.” The increasingly heated debate over slavery drove a deep wedge between North and South. In 1831, William Lloyd Garrison predicted that an eventual “separation between the free and slave States” was “unavoidable.” By midcentury, a large number of Americans had decided that southern slavery was an abomination that should not be allowed to expand into the western territories. The militant reformers who were determined to prevent slavery from expanding outside the South came to be called “free soilers.” Their crusade would reach a fiery climax in the Civil War.

CHAPTER REVIEW
Summary • 
 Religious Developments Starting in the late eighteenth century, Unitarians and Universalists in New England challenged the Christian notion of predestination and advocated that all humans (not just the select few) were capable of good deeds and could receive salvation. Echoing these ideas with their conception of salvation by free will, the preachers of the Second Great Awakening generated widespread interest among Protestants in frontier revivals. The more democratic sects, such as Baptists and Methodists, gained huge numbers of converts. Religion went hand in hand with reform in the “­burned-​­over district” in western New York, which was also the birthplace of several religious movements, including the Church of Jesus Christ of L ­ atter-​ ­day Saints (the Mormons).

•


 Transcendentalists A group of New England writers, ministers, and reformers who embraced a moral and spiritual idealism (Romanticism) in reaction to scientific rationalism and Christian orthodoxy. In their writings, they sought to “transcend” reason and the material world and encourage ­more-​­independent thought and reflection. At the same time, transcendentalism influenced the works of novelists, essayists, and poets, who created a uniquely “American” literature.

•


 ­Social-​­Reform Movements The cult of domesticity celebrated a “woman’s sphere” in the home and argued that young women should be trained not for the workplace but in the domestic ­arts—​­managing a kitchen, running a household, and nurturing the children. However, the rise of an urban middle class offered growing numbers of women more time to devote to societal concerns. Social r­ eformers—​ ­many of them ­women—​­sought to improve society and eradicate social evils. The most widespread movement was for ­temperance—​­the elimination of excessive drinking. Many activists focused on reforming prisons and asylums. With the Seneca Falls Convention of 1848, social reformers launched the women’s rights movement with the Declaration of Rights and Sentiments. In many parts of the country, reformers called for greater access to education through public schools. Amid the pervasive climate of reform, more than 100 utopian communities were established, including the Shakers, Brook Farm, and the Oneida Community.

•


A
 ­ nti-​­Slavery Movement Northern opponents of slavery promoted several solutions, including the American Colonization Society’s call for gradual emancipation and the deportation of African Americans to colonies in Africa. Abolitionism emerged in the 1830s, demanding an immediate end of slavery. Some abolitionists went even further, calling for full social and political equality among the races, although they disagreed over tactics. Abolitionist efforts in the North provoked fear and resentment among southern whites. Yet many northerners shared the belief in the racial inferiority of Africans and were hostile to the tactics and



 ­ essage of the abolitionists. African Americans in the North joined with abolim tionists to create an Underground Railroad, a network of safe havens to help slaves escape bondage in the South.

Chronology
1830–1831




 1840s 1846–1847

 Ministers organize the American Society for the Promotion of Temperance Charles G. Finney begins preaching in upstate New York Percentage of American churchgoers has doubled since 1800 Joseph Smith publishes the Book of Mormon William Lloyd Garrison begins publishing the Liberator American ­Anti-​­Slavery Society is founded Transcendental Club holds its first meeting Abolitionist editor Elijah P. Lovejoy is murdered Abolitionists form the Liberty party Methodists have become largest Protestant denomination in America Narrative of the Life of Frederick Douglass is published Mormons, led by Brigham Young, make the difficult trek to Utah At the Seneca Falls Convention, feminists issue the Declaration of Rights and Sentiments Sojourner Truth delivers her famous speech “Ar’n’t I a Woman?” Henry David Thoreau’s Walden, or Life in the Woods is published

Key Terms
Unitarians p. 507
Universalists p. 507
Second Great Awakening p. 508
 frontier revivals p. 509 Mormons p. 515 transcendentalism p. 518 temperance p. 528 cult of domesticity p. 530

Declaration of Rights and
Sentiments (1848) p. 532
 public schools p. 533 utopian communities p. 536 American Colonization Society (ACS) p. 538 abolitionism p. 539 Underground Railroad p. 545

Seneca Falls Convention (1848) p. 531


IJK
Go to InQuizitive to see what you’ve learned—and learn what you’ve missed—with personalized feedback along the way. 


A
HOUSE DIVIDED AND REBUILT

•


 pa r t four

 During the first half of the nineteenth century, Americans, restless and energetic, were optimistic about the future. The United States was the world’s largest republic. Its population continued to grow rapidly, economic ­conditions were improving, and tensions with Great Britain had eased. Above all, Americans continued to move westward, where vast expanses of cheap land lured farmers, ranchers, miners, and ­missionaries. By the end of the 1840s, the United States had again

 dramatically expanded its territory, from Texas west to California and the Pacific Northwest. America had become a transcontinental nation from the Atlantic to the Pacific. This extraordinary surge of territorial expansion was a mixed blessing, however. How to deal with slavery in the new western territories emerged as the nation’s flashpoint issue as differences grew among America’s three distinctive ­regions—​ ­North, South, and West. A series of political compromises had glossed over the fundamental issue of slavery, but ­anti-​­slavery activists opposed efforts to extend slavery into the West, and an emerging generation of politicians proved less willing to compromise. The continuing debate over allowing slavery into new territories eventually led many Americans to decide with Abraham Lincoln that the nation could not survive h ­ alf-​ ­slave and ­half-​­free. Something had to give. In a ­last-​­ditch effort to preserve the institution of slavery, eleven southern states seceded from the Union and created a separate Confederate nation, prompting northerners such as Abraham Lincoln to risk a civil war to restore the Union. No one realized in 1861 how costly the war would be: more than 700,000 soldiers and sailors would die in the struggle. Nor did a­ nyone envision how sweeping the war’s effects would be upon the nation’s future. The northern victory in 1865 restored the Union and helped accelerate America’s transformation into a modern ­nation-​­state. A national consciousness began to replace the sectional divisions of the prewar era, and a ­Republican-​­led Congress passed legislation to promote industrial and commercial development and western expansion. Although the Civil War ended slavery, the status of the freed African Americans remained precarious. Former slaves found themselves legally free, but few had property, homes, education, or training. Although the Fourteenth Amendment (1868) guaranteed the civil rights of African Americans and the



﻿  553


 Fifteenth Amendment (1870) declared that black men could vote, southern officials often ignored the new laws (as did some in northern states as well). The restoration of the former Confederate states to the Union did not come easily. Bitterness and resistance grew among the defeated southerners. Although Confederate leaders were stripped of voting rights, they continued to exercise considerable authority. In 1877, when the last federal troops were removed from the occupied South, former Confederates declared themselves “redeemed” from the stain of northern military occupation. By the end of the nineteenth century, most states of the former Confederacy had developed a system of legal discrimination against blacks that r­ e-​­created many aspects of slavery.





Western
­Expansion
1830–1848


Emigrants Crossing the Plains, or the Oregon Trail (1869) German American
 painter Albert Bierstadt captures the majestic sights of the frontier, though the transcontinental trek was also often grueling and bleak.

I


 n the American experience, the westward march of settlement was always a source of energy, hope, and yearning. Henry David Thoreau exclaimed that Americans “go westward as into the future, with a spirit of enterprise and adventure”—and the hope of freedom. The ­West—​­whether imagined as the enticing lands over the Allegheny Mountains that became Ohio and Kentucky or, later, the “black belt” farmlands of the Old Southwest, the fertile prairies watered by the Mississippi River, or the spectacular area along the Pacific coast that became the states of California, Oregon, and ­Washington—​­served as a powerful magnet for adventurous people dreaming of freedom, ­self-​­fulfillment, and economic gain. The Pacific Northwest teemed with fish, forests, and f­ur-​­bearing animals. Acquiring the ports along the Pacific coast would also allow the United States to expand its trade with Asia. During the 1840s and after, waves of people moved westward, seeking a better chance and more space in the West. “If hell lay to the west,” one pioneer declared, “Americans would cross heaven to get there.” Millions of people endured unrelenting hardships to fulfill their “providential destiny” to subdue the entire continent, even if it meant displacing the Indians in the process. By 1860, some 4.3 million people had settled in the ­trans-​­Mississippi West. Emigrants moved west largely for economic reasons. “To make money was their chief object,” said a pioneer woman in Texas, “all things else were subsidiary to it.” Waves of enterprising trappers and farmers, miners, merchants, and clerks, hunters, ranchers, teachers, household servants, and prostitutes, among others, headed west to seek their fortunes. Others sought religious freedom or new converts to Christianity. Whatever the reason, the pioneers formed an unceasing migratory stream flowing across the Great Plains and the Rocky Mountains.

 focus questions 1. Why did Americans move west of the Mississippi River during the 1830s and 1840s? How did they accomplish this, and where did they move to?

 2. How did Texas become part of the United States? Why was the process so complicated, and how did it impact national politics?

 3. What were the similarities and differences in the process for how California and Texas were settled and how they became part of the United States?

 4. How did the Mexican-American War impact national politics?

